District of Columbia statutes.
47-432

Right of District to sue in states; authority of Mayor to secure services.

(a)

In any state, or any subdivision thereof, in which the District of Columbia is authorized under the laws of such state to bring suit for the purpose of recovering taxes lawfully due and owing the District of Columbia, the Attorney General for the District of Columbia is authorized to bring such suit in the name of the District of Columbia in the courts of such state, or any subdivision thereof.

(b)

In connection with any such suit, the Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to secure professional and other services at such rates as may be usual and customary for such services in the jurisdiction involved.

History

Sept. 27, 1978, 92 Stat. 751, Pub. L. 95-387, § 3
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(a)(4), 52 DCR 2638

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-433.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-432.
1973 Ed., § 47-342: Sept. 27, 1978, 92 Stat. 751, Pub. L. 95-387, § 3.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.